Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.294

Teacher and administrator preparation—Working with paraeducators.

The professional educator standards board, in consultation with the paraeducator board created in RCW 28A.413.020 and the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall incorporate into the content required to complete a professional educator standards board-approved teacher or administrator preparation program the following:

(1) For teachers, information on how to direct a paraeducator working with students in the paraeducators' classroom; and

(2) For administrators, information on how to supervise and evaluate paraeducators.

[ 2017 c 237 s 14.]